Tables/Contraction/zh-tw-polyphone.cti
always 葉子 346-5-125-156-1
always 葉脈 346-5-134-2456-5
always 著作 1-34-5-125-25-5
always 著力 1-25-2-14-16-5
always 著名 1-34-5-134-13456-2
always 著實 1-25-2-24-156-2
always 著床 1-25-2-12-456-2
always 著急 1-146-3-13-16-2
always 著想 1-146-2-15-46-4
always 著慌 1-146-2-1235-456-3
always 著手 1-25-2-24-12356-4
always 著書 1-34-5-24-34-3
always 著有 1-34-5-234-4
always 著棋 1-25-2-245-16-2
always 著涼 1-146-3-14-46-2
always 著火 1-146-2-1235-25-4
always 著稱 1-34-5-12-1356-3
always 著者 1-34-5-1-2346-4
always 著色 1-25-2-15-2346-5
always 著落 1-146-2-14-25-5
always 著著 1-25-2-1-2346-1
always 著衣 1-25-2-16-3
always 著述 1-34-5-24-34-5
always 著重 1-25-2-1-12346-5
always 著陸 1-25-2-14-34-5
always 蒙難 134-1356-2-1345-1236-5
always 蓆子 15-16-2-125-156-1
always 蓋子 13-2456-5-125-156-1
always 蓼莪 14-34-5-2346-2
always 薄荷 135-126-5-1235-2346-2
always 薄行 135-126-2-15-13456-5
always 藉藉 13-16-2-13-16-2
always 藤子 124-1356-2-125-156-1
always 藥行 246-5-1235-1346-2
always 藥鋪 246-5-1234-34-5
always 蘊藏 256-5-245-1346-2
always 處事 12-34-4-24-156-5
always 處于 12-34-4-1256-2
always 處分 12-34-4-12345-136-5
always 處境 12-34-4-13-13456-5
always 處於 12-34-4-1256-2
always 處理 12-34-4-14-16-4
always 處罰 12-34-4-12345-345-2
always 處長 12-34-5-1-1346-4
always 號哭 1235-146-2-123-34-3
always 蚊子 123456-2-125-156-1
always 蛤蚌 13-2346-4-135-1346-5
always 蛤蚧 13-2346-4-13-346-5
always 蛤蜊 13-2346-4-14-16-5
always 蛻化 124-1246-5-1235-35-5
always 蝦蟆 1235-345-2-134-345-1
always 蝨子 24-156-3-125-156-1
always 蟬蛻 12-1236-2-124-1246-5
always 蟲子 12-12346-2-125-156-1
always 蠻橫 134-1236-2-1235-1356-5
always 血暈 15-346-4-256-5
always 血還 15-346-4-1235-12456-2
always 行业 1235-1346-2-346-5
always 行伍 1235-1346-2-34-4
always 行列 1235-1346-2-14-346-5
always 行員 1235-1346-2-45-2
always 行家 1235-1346-2-13-23456-3
always 行庫 1235-1346-2-123-34-5
always 行情 1235-1346-2-245-13456-2
always 行數 1235-1346-2-24-34-5
always 行會 1235-1346-2-1235-1246-5
always 行業 1235-1346-2-346-5
always 行款 1235-1346-2-123-12456-4
always 行狀 15-13456-5-1-456-5
always 行號 1235-1346-2-1235-146-5
always 行行 1235-1346-2-15-13456-2
always 行規 1235-1346-2-13-1246-3
always 行話 1235-1346-2-1235-35-5
always 行間 1235-1346-2-13-2345-3
always 衝冠 12-12346-3-13-12456-3
always 衡量 1235-1356-2-14-46-2
always 衣冠 16-3-13-12456-3
always 衣著 16-3-1-25-2
always 衣裳 16-3-24-1346-1
always 表率 135-246-4-24-2356-5
always 表相 135-246-4-15-46-5
always 袋子 145-2456-5-125-156-1
always 袖子 15-234-5-125-156-1
always 被子 135-356-5-125-156-1
always 裁度 245-2456-2-145-25-5
always 裁量 245-2456-2-14-46-2
always 裂縫 14-346-5-12345-1356-5
always 裙子 245-256-2-125-156-1
always 補假 135-34-4-13-23456-5
always 補給 135-34-4-13-16-4
always 補還 135-34-4-1235-12456-2
always 補闕 135-34-4-245-236-3
always 裡子 14-16-4-125-156-1
always 褂子 13-35-5-125-156-1
always 褲子 123-34-5-125-156-1
always 褻玩 15-346-5-12456-5
always 襪子 35-5-125-156-1
always 西樂 15-16-3-236-5
always 要挾 246-3-15-346-2
always 要求 246-3-245-234-2
always 要脅 246-3-15-346-2
always 覆校 12345-34-5-13-246-5
always 覆沒 12345-34-5-134-126-5
always 親家 245-13456-5-13-23456-3
always 討伐 124-146-4-12345-345-3
always 診脈 1-136-4-134-2456-5
always 詐降 1-345-5-15-46-2
always 評傳 1234-13456-2-1-12456-5
always 評量 1234-13456-2-14-46-2
always 試卷 24-156-5-13-45-5
always 該行 13-2456-3-1235-1346-2
always 誆騙 123-456-3-1234-2345-5
always 說客 24-1246-5-123-2346-5
always 說服 24-1246-5-12345-34-2
always 調停 124-246-2-124-13456-2
always 調合 124-246-2-1235-2346-2
always 調子 145-246-5-125-156-1
always 調教 124-246-2-13-246-5
always 調整 124-246-2-1-1356-4
always 調節 124-246-2-13-346-2
always 調解 124-246-2-13-346-4
always 調長 124-246-2-1-1346-4
always 調養 124-246-2-46-4
always 請假 245-13456-4-13-23456-5
always 論著 14-123456-5-1-34-5
always 論語 14-123456-2-1256-4
always 謔稱 1345-236-5-12-1356-3
always 謝朓 15-346-5-124-246-5
always 謾罵 134-1236-5-134-345-5
always 識相 24-156-5-15-46-5
always 譜子 1234-34-4-125-156-1
always 議處 16-5-12-34-4
always 議長 16-5-1-1346-4
always 變更 135-2345-5-13-1356-3
always 變相 135-2345-5-15-46-5
always 豆子 145-12356-5-125-156-1
always 豆豉 145-12356-5-12-156-4
always 豬仔 1-34-3-125-2456-4
always 豬圈 1-34-3-13-45-5
always 豹子 135-146-5-125-156-1
always 貌相 134-146-5-15-46-5
always 負累 12345-34-5-14-356-4
always 負荷 12345-34-5-1235-2346-5
always 財相 245-2456-2-15-46-5
always 財長 245-2456-2-1-1346-4
always 販子 12345-1236-5-125-156-1
always 賞玩 24-1346-4-12456-5
always 賢相 15-2345-2-15-46-5
always 赴難 12345-34-5-1345-1236-5
always 起子 245-16-4-125-156-1
always 跛子 135-126-4-125-156-1
always 路子 14-34-5-125-156-1
always 跳行 124-246-5-1235-1346-2
always 踉蹌 14-46-5-245-46-5
always 蹄子 124-16-2-125-156-1
always 蹊蹺 15-16-3-245-246-5
always 身分 24-136-3-12345-136-5
always 身子 24-136-3-125-156-1
always 車子 12-2346-3-125-156-1
always 車行 12-2346-3-1235-1346-2
always 車長 12-2346-3-1-1346-4
always 軋戲 13-345-3-15-16-5
always 軍樂 13-256-3-236-5
always 軍長 13-256-3-1-1346-4
always 輕率 245-13456-3-24-2356-5
always 輩分 135-356-5-12345-136-5
always 輩子 135-356-5-125-156-1
always 輪子 14-123456-2-125-156-1
always 辮子 135-2345-5-125-156-1
always 辱沒 1245-34-5-134-126-5
always 返還 12345-1236-4-1235-12456-2
always 退還 124-1246-5-1235-12456-2
always 适合 24-156-5-1235-2346-2
always 逃難 124-146-2-1345-1236-5
always 連長 14-2345-2-1-1346-4
always 逾分 1256-2-12345-136-5
always 遇難 1256-5-1345-1236-5
always 遊說 234-2-24-1246-5
always 過分 13-25-5-12345-136-5
always 過當 13-25-5-145-1346-5
always 道觀 145-146-5-13-12456-5
always 遛達 14-234-3-145-345-3
always 遣將 245-2345-4-13-46-5
always 適應 24-156-5-13456-5
always 適當 24-156-5-145-1346-5
always 遭難 125-146-3-1345-1236-5
always 遷都 245-2345-3-145-34-3
always 避難 135-16-5-1345-1236-5
always 還俗 1235-12456-2-15-34-2
always 還價 1235-12456-2-13-23456-5
always 還原 1235-12456-2-45-2
always 還手 1235-12456-2-24-12356-4
always 還本 1235-12456-2-135-136-4
always 還牙 1235-12456-2-23456-2
always 還眼 1235-12456-2-2345-4
always 還禮 1235-12456-2-14-16-4
always 還至 1235-12456-2-1-156-5
always 還鄉 1235-12456-2-15-46-3
always 還願 1235-12456-2-45-5
always 還魂 1235-12456-2-1235-123456-2
always 邊徼 135-2345-3-13-246-5
always 那么 1345-345-5-134-2346-1
always 那個 1345-345-4-13-2346-5
always 那堪 1345-345-4-123-1236-3
always 那有 1345-345-4-234-4
always 那能 1345-345-4-1345-1356-2
always 邪行 15-346-2-15-13456-5
always 郡長 13-256-5-1-1346-4
always 郢都 13456-4-145-34-3
always 部分 135-34-5-12345-136-5
always 部將 135-34-5-13-46-5
always 部長 135-34-5-1-1346-4
always 郵差 234-2-12-2456-3
always 都兵 145-34-3-135-13456-3
always 都司 145-34-3-15-156-3
always 都城 145-34-3-12-1356-2
always 都察 145-34-3-12-345-2
always 都尉 145-34-3-1246-5
always 都市 145-34-3-24-156-5
always 都廁 145-34-3-245-2346-5
always 都爾 145-34-3-156-4
always 都督 145-34-3-145-34-3
always 都統 145-34-3-124-12346-4
always 都軍 145-34-3-13-256-3
always 都邑 145-34-3-16-5
always 鄉導 15-46-5-145-146-4
always 鄉長 15-46-3-1-1346-4
always 酋長 245-234-2-1-1346-4
always 配樂 1234-356-5-236-5
always 配給 1234-356-5-13-16-4
always 酬應 12-12356-2-13456-5
always 釋卷 24-156-5-13-45-5
always 里長 14-16-4-1-1346-4
always 重九 12-12346-2-13-234-4
always 重估 12-12346-2-13-34-3
always 重來 12-12346-2-14-2456-2
always 重修 12-12346-2-15-234-3
always 重兄 12-12346-2-15-235-3
always 重光 12-12346-2-13-456-3
always 重入 12-12346-2-1245-34-5
always 重刊 12-12346-2-123-1236-3
always 重印 12-12346-2-1456-5
always 重回 12-12346-2-1235-1246-2
always 重圍 12-12346-2-1246-2
always 重奏 12-12346-2-125-12356-5
always 重婚 12-12346-2-1235-123456-3
always 重孫 12-12346-2-15-123456-3
always 重定 12-12346-2-145-13456-5
always 重寫 12-12346-2-15-346-4
always 重建 12-12346-2-13-2345-5
always 重復 12-12346-2-12345-34-5
always 重慶 12-12346-2-245-13456-5
always 重抄 12-12346-2-12-146-3
always 重振 12-12346-2-1-136-5
always 重整 12-12346-2-1-1356-4
always 重新 12-12346-2-15-1456-3
always 重洋 12-12346-2-46-2
always 重測 12-12346-2-245-2346-5
always 重演 12-12346-2-2345-4
always 重獲 12-12346-2-1235-25-5
always 重現 12-12346-2-15-2345-5
always 重申 12-12346-2-24-136-3
always 重疊 12-12346-2-145-346-2
always 重組 12-12346-2-125-34-4
always 重置 12-12346-2-1-156-5
always 重考 12-12346-2-123-146-4
always 重複 12-12346-2-12345-34-5
always 重設 12-12346-2-24-2346-5
always 重蹈 12-12346-2-145-146-5
always 重返 12-12346-2-12345-1236-4
always 重述 12-12346-2-24-34-5
always 重逢 12-12346-2-12345-1356-2
always 重重 12-12346-2-12-12346-2
always 重陽 12-12346-2-46-2
always 金子 13-1456-3-125-156-1
always 釘子 145-13456-3-125-156-1
always 釦子 123-12356-5-125-156-1
always 鉅著 13-1256-5-1-34-5
always 鉗子 245-2345-2-125-156-1
always 鉤子 13-12356-3-125-156-1
always 銀子 1456-2-125-156-1
always 銀行 1456-2-1235-1346-2
always 銷假 15-246-3-13-23456-5
always 鋪位 1234-34-5-1246-5
always 鋪子 1234-34-5-125-156-1
always 鋪面 1234-34-5-134-2345-5
always 鋸子 13-1256-5-125-156-1
always 錠子 145-13456-5-125-156-1
always 鍊子 14-2345-5-125-156-1
always 鍋子 13-25-3-125-156-1
always 鎗彈 245-46-3-145-1236-5
always 鎚子 12-1246-2-125-156-1
always 鎬京 1235-146-5-13-13456-3
always 鏡子 13-13456-5-125-156-1
always 鐵騎 124-346-4-13-16-5
always 鑰匙 246-5-24-156-4
always 鑲嵌 15-46-3-245-2345-5
always 鑽戒 125-12456-5-13-346-5
always 鑽石 125-12456-5-24-156-2
always 鑿子 125-146-2-125-156-1
always 長使 1-1346-4-24-156-4
always 長假 12-1346-2-13-23456-5
always 長像 1-1346-4-15-46-5
always 長兄 1-1346-4-15-235-3
always 長大 1-1346-4-145-345-5
always 長女 1-1346-4-1345-1256-4
always 長子 1-1346-4-125-156-4
always 長孫 1-1346-4-15-123456-3
always 長官 1-1346-4-13-12456-3
always 長幼 1-1346-4-234-5
always 長房 1-1346-4-12345-1346-2
always 長男 1-1346-4-1345-1236-2
always 長老 1-1346-4-14-146-4
always 長者 1-1346-4-1-2346-4
always 長著 1-1346-4-1-2346-1
always 長號 12-1346-2-1235-146-2
always 長輩 1-1346-4-135-356-5
always 長進 1-1346-4-13-1456-5
always 門子 134-136-2-125-156-1
always 門框 134-136-2-123-456-5
always 門檻 134-136-2-123-1236-4
always 門縫 134-136-2-12345-1356-5
always 閉塞 135-16-5-15-2346-5
always 開衩 123-2456-3-12-345-5
always 閒散 15-2345-2-15-1236-4
always 閒空 15-2345-2-123-12346-5
always 間接 13-2345-5-13-346-3
always 間斷 13-2345-5-145-12456-5
always 間歇 13-2345-5-15-346-3
always 間諜 13-2345-5-145-346-2
always 間隔 13-2345-5-13-2346-2
always 間隙 13-2345-5-15-16-5
always 閣子 13-2346-2-125-156-1
always 閱卷 236-5-13-45-5
always 闕失 245-236-3-24-156-3
always 闕如 245-236-3-1245-34-2
always 闕漏 245-236-3-14-12356-5
always 闕疑 245-236-3-16-2
always 阻嚇 125-34-4-1235-2346-5
always 阻塞 125-34-4-15-2346-5
always 阿俗 2346-3-15-34-2
always 阿諛 2346-3-1256-2
always 附和 12345-34-5-1235-2346-5
always 附著 12345-34-5-1-25-2
always 降伏 15-46-2-12345-34-2
always 降將 15-46-2-13-46-5
always 降敵 15-46-2-145-16-2
always 降書 15-46-2-24-34-3
always 降服 15-46-2-12345-34-2
always 降龍 15-46-2-14-12346-2
always 院子 45-5-125-156-1
always 院長 45-5-1-1346-4
always 陣子 1-136-5-125-156-1
always 隊長 145-1246-5-1-1346-4
always 隐藏 1456-4-245-1346-2
always 隨興 15-1246-2-15-13456-5
always 隱沒 1456-4-134-126-5
always 隱藏 1456-4-245-1346-2
always 雅樂 23456-4-236-5
always 雙重 24-456-3-12-12346-2
always 離間 14-16-2-13-2345-5
always 難地 1345-1236-5-145-16-5
always 難民 1345-1236-5-134-1456-2
always 難胸 1345-1236-5-15-235-3
always 雪茄 15-236-4-13-23456-3
always 電焊 145-2345-5-1235-1236-5
always 露白 14-12356-5-135-2456-2
always 露相 14-12356-5-15-46-5
always 露臉 14-12356-5-14-2345-4
always 露面 14-12356-5-134-2345-5
always 靖難 13-13456-5-1345-1236-5
always 靜脈 13-13456-5-134-2456-5
always 非分 12345-356-3-12345-136-5
always 非難 12345-356-3-1345-1236-5
always 面子 134-2345-5-125-156-1
always 靴子 15-236-3-125-156-1
always 鞋子 15-346-2-125-156-1
always 鞍子 1236-3-125-156-1
always 響應 15-46-4-13456-5
always 順應 24-123456-5-13456-5
always 領子 14-13456-4-125-156-1
always 頭子 124-12356-2-125-156-1
always 頸子 13-13456-4-125-156-1
always 顯著 15-2345-4-1-34-5
always 飛彈 12345-356-3-145-1236-5
always 飛漲 12345-356-3-1-1346-5
always 餃子 13-246-4-125-156-1
always 養分 46-4-12345-136-5
always 餘興 1256-2-15-13456-5
always 館子 13-12456-4-125-156-1
always 館長 13-12456-4-1-1346-4
always 首相 24-12356-4-15-46-5
always 首都 24-12356-4-145-34-3
always 首長 24-12356-4-1-1346-4
always 馬子 134-345-4-125-156-1
always 馬虎 134-345-4-1235-34-3
always 馮河 1234-13456-2-1235-2346-2
always 騎兵 13-16-5-135-13456-3
always 騙子 1234-2345-5-125-156-1
always 騾子 14-25-2-125-156-1
always 驍騎 15-246-3-13-16-5
always 驕橫 13-246-3-1235-1356-5
always 骨子 13-34-4-125-156-1
always 骨相 13-34-4-15-46-5
always 體胖 124-16-4-1234-1236-2
always 高更 13-146-3-13-1356-3
always 高興 13-146-3-15-13456-5
always 高麗 13-146-3-14-16-2
